en: Cloth thickness: Heavyweight; Lightweight; Medium weight; Plush; Other
ru: Толщина ткани: Плотная; Легкая; Средней плотности; Плюш; Другое
pt-BR: Espessura do tecido: Pesada; Leve; Média; Pelúcia; Outras
nl: Doek dikte: Zwaar; Licht; Middelzwaar; Pluche; Overig
ko: 천 두께: 헤비웨이트; 라이트웨이트; 미디엄웨이트; 플러시; 기타
hu: Szövet vastagsága: Nehéz súlyú; Könnyű súlyú; Közepes súlyú; Plüss; Egyéb
sl-SI: Debelina tkanine: Težko; Lahko; Srednje težko; Plišasto; Drugo
vi: Độ dày vải: Dày; Mỏng; Dày vừa; Dày nhung; Khác
tr: Bez kalınlığı: Kalın; İnce; Orta kalınlıkta; Pelüş; Diğer
bg-BG: Дебелина на плата: Голяма плътност; Малка плътност; Средна плътност; Плюш; Други
zh-CN: 布料厚度: 重磅; 轻薄; 中等厚度; 毛绒; 其他
sk-SK: Hrúbka látky: Vysoká gramáž; Ľahká; Stredná hrúbka; Plyšová; Iné
es: Grosor de la tela: Pesado; Ligero; Peso medio; Afelpado; Otro
zh-TW: 布料厚度: 重磅; 輕量; 中磅; 絨毛; 其他
hr-HR: Debljina tkanine: Teška; Laka; Srednje teška; Pliš; Ostalo
el: Πάχος υφάσματος: Βαρύ; Ελαφρύ; Μεσαίου βάρους; Βελούδινο (plush); Άλλο
lt-LT: Audinio storis: Storas; Plonas; Vidutinio storio; Pliušinis; Kita
th: ความหนาของผ้า: หนา; บาง; หนาปานกลาง; หนานุ่ม; อื่นๆ
de: Stoffdicke: Schwer; Leicht; Mittelschwer; Plüsch; Andere
da: Stoffets tykkelse: Kraftig; Let; Mellemkraftig; Plys; Andet
it: spessore del tessuto: Pesante; Leggero; Peso medio; Felpato; Altro
pt-PT: Espessura do tecido: Pesado; Leve; Peso médio; Pelúcia; Outra
cs: Tloušťka látky: Těžká gramáž; Lehká gramáž; Střední gramáž; Plyš; Jiná
fi: Kankaan paksuus: Paksu; Kevyt; Keskivahva; Muhkea; Muu
ja: 布の厚さ: ヘビーウェイト; ライトウェイト; ミディアムウェイト; プラッシュ; その他
fr: Épaisseur du tissu: Lourd; Léger; Poids moyen; Pelucheux; Autre
pl: Grubość tkaniny: Gruba; Cienka; Średnia; Pluszowa; Inna
sv: Tygets tjocklek: Kraftig; Lättvikt; Mellanvikt; Plysch; Övrigt
nb: Tykkelsen på tøyet: Tung; Lett; Middels tung; Plysj; Annet
ro-RO: Grosimea țesăturii: Gros; Subțire; Mediu; Plușat; Altele